Illinois, session 104th, HB3769.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Occupational Therapy Practice Act 5is amended by changing Section 3.1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 75/3.1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)8    Sec. 3.1. Referrals. 9    (a) A licensed occupational therapist or licensed 10occupational therapy assistant may, within the licensee's 11scope of practice, provide occupational therapy evaluate, 12initiate, and provide occupational therapy services and 13consult with, educate, evaluate, and monitor services for 14individuals, groups, and populations concerning occupational 15therapy needs without a referral.16    (b) (Blank).17    (b-5) A referral is not required for the purpose of 18providing consultation, habilitation, screening, education, 19wellness, prevention, environmental assessments, and 20work-related ergonomic services. 21    (c) Referral from a physician or other health care 22provider is not required for evaluation or intervention for 23children and youths if an occupational therapist or   HB3769 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09929 AAS 19999 b1occupational therapy assistant provides the services in a 2school-based or educational environment, including the child's 3home. 4    (d) Except for occupational therapy services within the 5licensee's scope of practice at the time of evaluation and 6services provided pursuant to subsections (b-5) or (c), an An 7occupational therapist shall refer a patient to the patient's 8treating health care professional of record, or to a health 9care professional of the patient's choosing if there is no 10health care professional of record, if: 11        (1) the patient does not demonstrate measurable or 12    functional improvement after 10 visits or 15 business 13    days, whichever occurs first, and continued improvement 14    thereafter;15        (2) the patient was under the care of an occupational 16    therapist without a diagnosis established by a health care 17    professional of a chronic disease that may benefit from 18    occupational therapy and returns for services for the same 19    or similar condition 30 calendar days after being 20    discharged by the occupational therapist; or21        (3) the patient's medical condition, at the time of 22    evaluation or services, is determined to be beyond the 23    scope of practice of the occupational therapist. 24(Source: P.A. 103-251, eff. 1-1-24.)